West Virginia, session 2026, SB21.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-25f. Participation in non-school athletic activities. The Legislature hereby finds that:(1) While participation in school-sponsored extracurricular sports is a voluntary opportunity, no student-athlete, coach, or athletic trainer should be deprived of additional opportunities to advance or showcase their skills purely because they are associated with a school sports team;(2) Prohibiting a student-athlete, coach, or athletic trainer from participating in non-school sponsored events or activities as a condition for association with a school-sponsored team is unlawfully arbitrary and is not rationally related to a state purpose; and(3) A county board of education and the West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission may not restrict nor prohibit a student, coach, or athletic trainer from competing in non-school sponsored events or participating on non-school sponsored competitive teams as a condition of being associated with a school-sponsored extracurricular activity or sport.